California statutes. Education Code
(3) The term of office of one student member of the board shall commence on July 1 of an even-numbered year and expire on June 30 two
 years thereafter. The term of office of the other student member of the board shall commence on July 1 of an odd-numbered year and expire on June 30 two years thereafter. Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a student member who graduates from the student member’s college or university on or after January 1 of the second year of the student member’s term of office may serve the remainder of the term. If the Governor has not appointed a successor pursuant to this subdivision, a student member whose term of office expires on June 30 of any year may remain in office until January 1 of the following year, or until a successor is appointed by the Governor, whichever occurs first.

(4) A student member shall have the student member’s tuition fee waived for the duration of the student member’s term of office.

(c) (1) A faculty member from the California State University,
 who shall be tenured at the California State University campus at which the faculty member teaches, shall also be appointed by the Governor to serve on the board for a two-year term. In the selection of a faculty member as a member of the board, the Governor shall appoint the faculty member from a list of names of at least two persons furnished by the Academic Senate of the California State University.

(2) The faculty member of the board appointed by the Governor pursuant to this subdivision shall not participate on any subcommittee of the board responsible for collective bargaining negotiations.

(3) The two-year term of office of the faculty member of the board shall commence on July 1, and, if the Governor has not appointed a successor under paragraph (1), the faculty member may remain in office after the term expires for one additional year, or until a successor is appointed by
 the Governor, whichever occurs first.

(d) (1) Members of the board shall be selected from outstanding lay citizens of California who have a strong interest in the further development and improvement of the California State University.

(2) Members of the board, to the greatest extent possible, should be inclusive and representative of the many demographic groups found in California, and the board should reflect diversity of race and gender, and should include, among others, disabled persons and veterans. In furtherance of the mission of the California State University, a member of the board should embrace the basic role and responsibility of a member of the board to bring their own best thinking and personal views to the board’s discussion, determining their own position on each
 issue rather than being bound to represent or advocate for the positions of a particular organization or constituency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 103, Sec. 1.   (AB 2275)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66602.5.

All meetings of the trustees shall, except as otherwise provided in Section 66602.7, be subject to Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 523, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

66602.7.

Notwithstanding Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code:

(a) (1) Action taken by a committee of the trustees and final action by the full board of trustees, on a proposal for the compensation package of the following executive officers shall occur in an open session of each of those bodies, and shall include a disclosure of the compensation package and rationale for the action:

(A) The Chancellor of the California State University.

(B) The president of an individual campus.

(C) A vice chancellor.

(D) The treasurer.

(E) The general counsel.

(F) The trustees’ secretary.

 (2) Members of the public shall be afforded the opportunity to address the committee and full board on the proposal during or before consideration of the action item.

(b) Discussion by a committee of the trustees of, and action on, an executive compensation program or policy, and any final action by the full board of trustees on that program or policy, shall occur in open session of each of those bodies.

(c) Compensation for the principal officers of the trustees and the officers of the university shall include salary, benefits, perquisites, severance payments (except those made in connection with a dismissal or a litigation settlement), retirement benefits, or any other form of compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 523, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

66603.

The term of the appointive trustees shall be eight years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66604.

The expiration of a trustee’s term of office as a member of the State Board of Education or any earlier vacancy in that office shall create a vacancy in his trusteeship, unless the term ascribed thereto by lot has already expired. In case of any vacancy on the board of trustees, the Governor shall appoint a successor for the balance of the term as to which such vacancy exists.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66604.5.

Each appointive trustee shall receive actual and necessary travel expenses and one hundred dollars ($100) for each day he or she is attending to official business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 954, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66605.

If the trustees and the Regents of the University of California both consent, the Chancellor of the California State University shall sit with the Regents of the University of California in an advisory capacity and the President of the University of California shall sit with the trustees in an advisory capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

66606.

The Trustees of the California State University shall succeed to the powers, duties, and functions with respect to the management, administration, and control of the state colleges heretofore vested in the State Board of Education or in the Director of Education, including all powers, duties, obligations, and functions specified in Article 2 (commencing with Section 90010) of Chapter 8 of Part 55, and all obligations assumed by the State Board of Education pursuant to that article prior to July 1, 1961.

On and after July 1, 1961, the Trustees of the California State University shall have full power and responsibility in the construction and development of any state university campus, and any buildings or other facilities or improvements connected with the California State University. The powers shall be exercised by the Trustees of the California State University notwithstanding Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 14950) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, except that the powers shall be carried out pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 10700) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code known as the California State University Contract Law.

The Trustees of the California State University may accept gifts of land, or gifts of options on land, may accept and expend gifts of money for the purchase of land or options on land, and may enter into negotiations and contracts for the purchase of land for a future state university site in the vicinity of any of the areas specified in the recommendations contained in the Master Plan for Higher Education printed on page 42, paragraph 5, Senate Journal (Regular Session) for February 1, 1960, except that the gifts, expenditures, negotiations, and contracts shall not obligate the expenditure of any state funds for the purchase of the land or for development on the land, unless the Legislature subsequently approves the obligation by appropriating the funds for that specific purpose.

Any acceptance, acceptance and expenditure, or negotiations and contract may be conditioned upon an automatic reversion back to the donor or automatic termination of the negotiations and contract if a new state university is not established at a specific site prior to a specific date designated by the trustees and the donor or the trustees and the person or corporation with whom the trustees are negotiating or contracting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 1.5.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

66606.2.

Recognizing the unique mission and functions of the California State University among the departments, agencies, and boards of the state, it is the intent of the Legislature that both of the following occur:

(a) Before legislation that, by its terms, applies to the state or its agencies, departments, or boards, may apply to the California State University, the legislation should be compatible with the mission and functions of the California State University.

(b) The California State University not be governed by any statute enacted after January 1, 1997, that does not amend a previously applicable act and that applies generally to the state or to state agencies, departments, or boards, unless the statute expressly provides that the California State University is to be governed by that statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 938, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

66607.

The California State University shall be entirely independent of all political and sectarian influence and kept free therefrom in the appointment of its trustees and in the administration of its affairs, and no person shall be debarred admission to any department of the state university on account of sex.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

66609.

(a) All state employees employed on June 30, 1961, in carrying out functions transferred to the Trustees of California State University by this chapter, except persons employed by the Director of Education in the Division of State Colleges and Teacher Education of the State Department of Education, are transferred to the California State University.

(b) Nonacademic employees transferred under this section shall retain their respective positions in the state service, together with the personnel benefits accumulated by them at the time of transfer, and shall retain the rights attached under the law to the positions that they held at the time of transfer. All nonacademic positions filled by the trustees on and after July 1, 1961, shall be by appointment made in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 89500) of Part 55, and persons so appointed shall be subject to Chapter 5.

(c) (1) The trustees shall provide, or cooperate in providing, academic and administrative employees transferred by this section with personnel rights and benefits at least equal to those accumulated by them as employees of the state colleges, except that any administrative employee may be reassigned to an academic or other position commensurate with his or her qualifications at the salary fixed for that position. An administrative employee so reassigned shall have a right to appeal from that reassignment, but only as to whether the position to which he or she is reassigned is commensurate with his or her qualifications. All academic and administrative positions filled by the trustees on and after July 1, 1961, shall be filled by appointment made solely at the discretion of the trustees.

(2) The trustees shall establish and adjust the salaries and classifications of all academic, nonacademic, and administrative positions and neither Section 19825 of the Government Code nor any other provision of law requiring approval by a state officer or agency for salaries or classifications shall be applicable thereto. In establishing and adjusting salaries, consideration shall be given to the maintenance of the state university in a competitive position in the recruitment and retention of qualified personnel in relation to other educational institutions, private industry, or public jurisdictions that are employing personnel with similar duties and responsibilities.

(3) The establishment and adjustment of salaries for nonacademic employees shall be in accordance with the standards prescribed in Section 19826 of the Government Code. The trustees, however, shall make no adjustments that require expenditures in excess of existing appropriations available for the payment of salaries. Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 89500) of Part 52, relating to appeals from dismissal, demotion, or suspension, shall be applicable to academic employees.

(d) Persons excluded from the transfer made by this section shall retain all the rights and privileges conferred upon civil service employees by law. Personnel of state agencies employed in state university work other than those transferred by this section, and who are employed by the trustees prior to July 1, 1962, shall be provided with personnel rights and benefits at least equal to those accumulated by them as employees of those state agencies.

(e) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that, if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 132.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

66610.

The California State University shall comply with Section 668.18(c)(1)(ii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section read on July 1, 2010. The Trustees of the California State University may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 145, Sec. 1.   (SB 418)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

66611.

(a) The California State University may require employees, prospective employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The California State University shall electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 26.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Community Colleges [66700. - 66700.]

66700.

The California Community Colleges are postsecondary schools and shall continue to be a part of the public school system of this state. The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall prescribe minimum standards for the formation and operation of the California Community Colleges and exercise general supervision over the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 219.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.2. Student Transfer [66720. - 66749.9.]



  ARTICLE 1. Transfer System [66720. - 66722.5.]

66720.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, the Regents of the University of California, and the Trustees of the California State University, with appropriate consultation with the Academic Senates of the respective segments, shall jointly develop, maintain, and disseminate a common core curriculum in general education courses for the purposes of transfer. Any person who has successfully completed the transfer core curriculum, shall be deemed to have thereby completed all lower division general education requirements for the University of California and the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

66721.

Upon development of the transfer core curriculum pursuant to Section 66720, and upon any subsequent joint revision of that curriculum, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, the Regents of the University of California, and the Trustees of the California State University shall jointly cause the curriculum to be published and distributed to each public school in this state that provides instruction in any of the grades 7 to 12, inclusive, and to each community college in this state, with an emphasis on the communication of that information to each school or college having a high proportion of students who are members of one or more ethnic minorities. In addition, the Board of Governors shall distribute that transfer core curriculum to the State Board of Education, which shall apply that information to ensure, through its curriculum development activities, that public school pupils enrolled in any of the grades 9 to 12, inclusive, are aware of the academic requirements for preparation for higher education and may receive any necessary academic remediation in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

66721.4.

(a) The California State University and the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall work together to establish the most effective methods to inform students, college advisers, and the general public about the associate degree for transfer and specific details that help students navigate this transfer pathway, as successfully as possible, pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745). The methods established by the California State University and the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall include, but not be limited to, Internet notification. The final methods determined by the two segments shall be completed prior to the beginning of the fall term of the 2011–12 academic year and included as part of
 the report required by subdivision (a) of Section 66749.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that community college students be informed of the California State University majors that are considered to be similar to community college majors or areas of emphasis required to obtain an associate degree for transfer pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 66745).

(c) A community college district may use the methods established by the California State University and the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, pursuant to subdivision (a), or a community college district may use other methods to inform community college students of the California State University majors that are considered to be similar to community college majors or areas of emphasis required to obtain an associate degree for transfer pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section
 66745).

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges not mandate community college districts to perform any new state reimbursable activity or program for purposes of implementing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 427, Sec. 1.   (AB 2302)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

66721.5.

(a) (1) The governing board of each community college district shall direct the appropriate officials at their respective campuses to provide each of their students with a copy of the current transfer core curriculum.

(2) As used in this section, “transfer core curriculum” means the lower-division, general education transfer curriculum that, pursuant to Section 66720, is fully articulated between the California Community Colleges and the California State University and University of California.

(b) A copy of the current transfer core curriculum shall be distributed to each newly admitted community college student who is enrolled in a degree or certification program and is physically in attendance at the institution. 

(c) The governing board of a community college district shall ensure that the text of the current transfer core curriculum is included in the published class schedule for each academic term. Copies of the transfer core curriculum may also be made available in other locations on each campus, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) The admissions office.

(2) The bookstore.

(3) The career counseling center.

(4) The veteran’s affairs office.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the governing board of a community college may, as an alternative to the methods of distribution set forth in subdivision (c), distribute copies of the current transfer core curriculum by any of the following means:

(1) During the registration process.

(2) By mail, with the registration materials or the enrollment materials, or both, or with other items sent to students.

(3) During the issuance of student identification cards.

(4) During student orientation programs.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the distribution of the transfer core curriculum to community college students.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 187, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

66721.7.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that community college students who wish to earn the baccalaureate degree at the University of California are provided with clear and effective directions that specify curricular paths to this degree.

(b) This section shall not limit in any way the ability of students to gain admission through alternative paths to transfer, such as the California General Education Transfer Curriculum.

(c) The University of California is requested to address deficiencies in the articulation of major preparation courses between the California Community Colleges and the various UC campuses to make it easier for prospective transfer students to identify the community
 college courses that meet major preparation requirements across the various campuses of the university.

(d) The University of California is requested to identify commonalities and differences in similar majors across all UC campuses in order to accomplish all of the following:

(1) To provide students with general descriptions of each major.

(2) To identify lower division degree requirements that are common across UC campuses.

(3) To identify additional academic requirements at each UC campus.

(4) To describe additional criteria that students must achieve to be admitted at the various UC campuses.

(e) (1) When four or more UC campuses that award undergraduate degrees have articulated specific courses and course sequences of the California Community Colleges for common requirements in similar majors, the remaining UC campuses that offer undergraduate degrees are requested to also articulate these specific community college courses and course sequences. The Legislature recognizes that UC may adopt provisions allowing individual UC campuses to opt out of this articulation process on a case-by-case basis, but these provisions should be infrequently used. The Academic Senate of the University of California is requested to notify the California Community Colleges when an articulation request is denied, and to provide information that will enable the California Community Colleges to achieve course comparability with UC.

(2) For at least the 20 most high-demand undergraduate majors, and with the ultimate goal of including all majors for
 which it is feasible, UC is requested to specify lower division transfer paths clearly identifying commonalities and differences, on a comparative basis across UC campuses offering specific major programs. The Academic Senate of the University of California is requested to review the existing differences in lower division major preparation in each major across UC campuses, recognizing that one goal of these requirements should be to achieve similarity to the greatest degree that is academically appropriate.

(3) The University of California is requested to include all of the following in the systemwide lower division transfer paths for the high-demand baccalaureate major degree programs:

(A) Lower division general education requirements for the university.

(B) Lower division major preparation requirements that are
 common across undergraduate campuses.

(C) Additional lower division degree requirements that are unique to an individual campus.

(D) Elective units, as appropriate.

(E) Additional criteria, such as grade point averages and minimum grades, to ensure that students are competitive in selective majors.

(4) The systemwide lower division transfer paths shall be specified in sufficient manner and detail so that existing and future community college lower division courses may be articulated, according to the usual procedures, to the corresponding UC courses or course descriptions.

(f) (1) The University of California is requested to, and the Chancellor of the California
 Community Colleges shall, in consultation with the Academic Senate of the California Community Colleges, on or before January 1, 2008, facilitate the articulation of those lower division, baccalaureate-level courses at each campus of the California Community Colleges that meet the lower division transfer path requirements for each major specified by UC in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(2) The University of California is requested to annually review, and update as appropriate, the lower division transfer paths and articulation to ensure that they reflect current UC campus degree requirements and community college curricula, and share the results of that review with the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(g) As allowed by enrollment demand and available space, UC is requested to develop transfer admission agreement programs for students at each campus of the
 California Community Colleges who demonstrate the intent to meet the requirements of this section, including the declaration of a major and identification of a choice of a destination campus. The transfer admission agreement shall guarantee admission to the campus and major identified in the agreement and transfer of all units specified in the agreement, subject to the student’s successful completion of the requirements of the agreement. It is the intent of the Legislature that the transfer admission agreements entered into under this section be made available to students early in their academic coursework. However, this section shall not preclude or limit the development or issuance of transfer admission agreements for students at any appropriate time up to the point of application.

(h) A path to transfer, as specified in this section, shall be available to any community college student who desires to transfer to UC, and shall not be limited
 to students who secure a transfer admission agreement as specified in subdivision (g). A student who successfully completes a path to transfer, but who does not secure a transfer admission agreement, shall be guaranteed the transferability and degree applicability for all units that the student has earned pursuant to the path to transfer. However, this section shall not guarantee admission to UC, or to a specific UC campus, for a student who has not secured a transfer admission agreement.

(i) The University of California is requested to, and the California Community Colleges shall, on a three-year periodic cycle, jointly conduct a review of a random representative sample of transcripts of students who have transferred to UC and of students preparing for transfer to determine the effectiveness of the transfer preparation pathways referenced in this section.

(j) For purposes of this
 section, “UC” means the University of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 74, Sec. 2.   (SB 619)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66721.8.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a transparent process for transfer that is designed to assist students in identifying and taking the community college courses that will prepare them for success in specific University of California majors is a state priority.

(b) The Legislature recognizes that, pursuant to Section 66721.7, the University of California has been working with the California Community Colleges to examine and seek improvements to the transfer process. It is the intent of the Legislature that, as part of this ongoing effort, the creation of various viable pathways to transfer, including the development of an associate degree for transfer granted by community college districts, be
 considered by the University of California as it endeavors to enhance the transfer process.

(c) The University of California is requested to continue its examination of articulation of lower division major prerequisites in high-demand transfer majors with a goal of working in collaboration with the California Community Colleges to design community college transfer degrees that provide students adequate preparation for entry into a major. The University of California is also requested to consider offering guaranteed eligibility for admission into a University of California campus that accepts a designated community college transfer degree for admission into a designated University of California major. Further, the University of California is requested to implement pathways to qualify community college transfer courses for a designated University of California major by designating a series of community college courses that provide sufficient
 lower division preparation for a designated University of California major and that will be accepted by the University of California.

(d) The University of California is requested to provide an interim progress report on its review of the various transfer pathways discussed in this section to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before June 30, 2011, and to provide a final report to those committees, with specific findings regarding the University of California’s implementation of those transfer pathways, no later than December 31, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 427, Sec. 2.   (AB 2302)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

66722.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the transfer function shall be a central institutional priority of all segments of higher education in California, and that the segments shall have as a fundamental policy and practice the maintenance of an effective transfer system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

66722.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the segments of higher education shall pursue the development of transfer agreement programs that specify the curricular requirements that must be met, and the level of achievement that must be attained, by community college students in order for those students to transfer to the campus, undergraduate college, or major of choice in the public four-year segments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Common Course Numbering System [66725. - 66725.5.]

66725.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to facilitate articulation and seamless integration of California’s postsecondary institutions by facilitating the adoption and integration of a common course numbering system among the public and private postsecondary institutions. The purpose of building and implementing a common course numbering system is to provide for the effective and efficient progression of students within and among the higher education segments and to minimize duplication of coursework.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) Effective transfer programs provide a clear path for obtaining the preparation necessary for upper-division major coursework and graduation at a four-year college or university. The segments have made significant progress in developing articulation agreements that specify required coursework and other academic preparation necessary for transfer students to succeed at a four-year institution. These articulation agreements are essential to provide the basis for a common course numbering system that facilitates transfer student success.

(2) In implementing this article, the public postsecondary educational institutions and other parties involved should assess programs and build upon those proving to be the most effective in communicating articulation, such as the California Articulation Number (CAN) system, the Intersegmental Major Preparation Articulated Curriculum (IMPAC) project, the Intersegmental General Education Transfer Curriculum (IGETC), and the Articulation System Stimulating Interinstitutional Student Transfer (ASSIST).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 737, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

66725.3.

(a) Not later than June 1, 2006, the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall adopt, and the University of California and private postsecondary institutions may adopt, a common course numbering system for the 20 highest-demand majors in the respective segments.

(b) Not later than June 30, 2006, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, report to the Legislature on the status of the activities of their respective segments as they relate to subdivision (a) and on the plans of their respective segments to implement a common course numbering system for the majors that are not covered by subdivision (a).

(c) Each campus of a public postsecondary educational institution shall incorporate the common course numbering system in its catalogue. This incorporation into a campus catalogue shall occur at the next adoption of a campus catalogue after June 1, 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 737, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

66725.5.

(a) (1) To streamline transfer from two- to four-year postsecondary educational institutions and reduce excess credit accumulation, on or before July 1, 2027, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The California Community Colleges shall adopt a common course numbering system for all general education requirement courses and transfer pathway courses.

(B) Each community college campus shall incorporate common course numbers from the adopted common course numbering system in its
 catalog.

(2) The common course numbering system shall be student facing, based on the work of the workgroup established in Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021, and ensure that comparable courses across all community colleges have the same course number.

(3) To support the development and implementation of a common course numbering system for the California Community College system, the workgroup established in Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 shall consider starting with courses included in the Course Identification Numbering System (C-ID) and expanding to general education requirements and transfer pathway courses pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The common course numbering system may have the same alphabetical identifier and same numerical identifier for each
 course that shares the same C-ID course description, pursuant to both of the following:

(1) For all courses included in the C-ID, the California Community Colleges may adopt the alphabetical and numerical identifier of the C-ID course descriptor as the same common course number at all community colleges.

(2) For all general education requirements and transfer pathway courses that are not included in the C-ID, intersegmental discipline faculty through the C-ID process may develop a C-ID course descriptor for each of these community college courses. Once a C-ID course descriptor is developed, the California Community Colleges may adopt the alphabetical and numerical identifier of the C-ID course descriptor as the same common course number at all community colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.   (AB 3290)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transfer Functions [66730. - 66744.2.]

66730.

(a) The Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall have as a fundamental policy the maintenance of a healthy and expanded student transfer system. Both the University of California and the California State University shall have as a basic enrollment policy the maintenance of upper division enrollment, which are students who have attained upper division status, at 60 percent of total undergraduate enrollment. This goal shall be met through programs aimed at increasing the numbers of qualified transfer students from the community colleges without denying eligible freshmen applicants. 

(1) The California State University shall maintain its upper division enrollment, which are students who have attained upper division status, at approximately 60 percent of total undergraduate enrollment. Its planning documents shall reflect this policy. 

(2) Commencing in the 1991–92 academic year, the University of California shall progressively increase the percentage that upper division enrollment systemwide is of total undergraduate enrollment through the 1995–96 academic year until that percentage reaches approximately 60 percent. This shall be accomplished through increases in the numbers of community college transfer students admitted to upper division standing at the university without denying eligible freshmen applicants. Planning documents shall reflect these expected increases. 

(b) The governing board of each segment shall ensure that individual university and college campus enrollment plans include adequate upper division places for community college transfer students in all undergraduate colleges or schools, and that each undergraduate college or school on each campus participates in developing articulation and transfer agreement programs with community colleges. The governing boards shall meet this goal within their respective general statewide planning framework used to attain and maintain the state’s goal of a 60/40 ratio of upper to lower division students, their segmental enrollment planning processes, and campus planning regarding program balance, educational quality, and other relevant goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66731.

Student matriculation from community colleges through the University of California and the California State University shall be recognized by the Governor, Legislature, and the governing boards of each of California’s public postsecondary education segments as a central institutional priority of all segments of higher education.
